Massachusetts, session 194th, S826.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following new
section:-
(x) If the policy owner of a life, disability or long term care insurance policy has an agent
of record, the insurer must also notify the agent of the impending lapse in coverage or mail or
send electronically a copy of the notification of the impending lapse in coverage) to the agent at
least 21 days before the effective date of any such lapse. Receipt of such notice does not make
the agent responsible for any lapse in coverage. An insurer is not required to notify the agent
under this section if any of the following applies:
of 2

(a) The insurer maintains an online system that pushes out a notice of pending lapse to
the broker of record to independently determine if a policy is about to lapse.
(b) The insurer maintains a procedure that pushes out a notice that allows an agent to
independently determine whether the notice of lapse has been sent to the insured.
(c) The insurer has no record of the current agent of record.
(d) The agent is employed by the insurer or an affiliate of the insurer.
of 2